District of Columbia statutes.
21-146

Contract for sale by adult in behalf of himself and infant.

When a contract is made for the sale of real estate by persons interested therein jointly or in common with an infant, for and in behalf of all the persons so interested, which the court, upon a hearing and examination of the circumstances, considers to be for the interest and advantage both of the infant and of the other persons interested therein to be confirmed, the court may confirm the contract and order a deed to be executed according to it. Sales and deeds made in pursuance of the order are sufficient in law to transfer the estate and interest of the infant in the real estate.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Partition of lands, tenements, or hereditaments on the complaint of a tenant in common, effect of this section, see § 16-2901.
This section is referenced in § 16-2901.
1981 Ed., § 21-146.
1973 Ed., § 21-146.